Maryland, session 2025, HB1227.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–302.
(e) (2) (i) A citation issued as the result of a vehicle height monitoring
system, a traffic control signal monitoring system, a speed monitoring system, a work zone
speed control system or a stop sign monitoring system controlled by a political subdivision,
a school bus monitoring camera, a bus lane monitoring system, or a noise abatement
monitoring system shall provide that, in an uncontested case, the penalty shall be paid
directly to that political subdivision.
(ii) A citation issued as the result of a traffic control signal
monitoring system or a work zone speed control system controlled by a State agency, or as
a result of a vehicle height monitoring system, a traffic control signal monitoring system, a
speed monitoring system, a stop sign monitoring system, a school bus monitoring camera,
a bus lane monitoring system, or a noise abatement monitoring system in a case contested
in District Court, shall provide that the penalty shall be paid directly to [the]:
1. BEGINNING OCTOBER 1, 2025, MONTGOMERY
COUNTY FOR CITATIONS ISSUED FOR ALLEGED VIOLATIONS IN MONTGOMERY
COUNTY; OR
2. THE District Court FOR CITATIONS ISSUED FOR
ALLEGED VIOLATIONS IN ALL OTHER POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS.
(4) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (5) of this subsection, from the
fines collected by a political subdivision as a result of violations enforced by speed
monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, stop sign monitoring systems, school
bus monitoring cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement monitoring
systems, a political subdivision:
1. May recover the costs of implementing and administering
the speed monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, school bus monitoring
cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement monitoring systems; and
2. Subject to subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this
paragraph, may spend any remaining balance solely for public safety purposes, including
pedestrian or highway safety programs.
(ii) 1. For any fiscal year, if the balance remaining from the fines
collected by a political subdivision as a result of violations enforced by speed monitoring
systems, after the costs of implementing and administering the systems are recovered in
accordance with subparagraph (i)1 of this paragraph, is greater than 10% of the total
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 589
revenues of the political subdivision for the fiscal year, the political subdivision shall remit
any funds that exceed 10% of the total revenues to the Comptroller.
2. The Comptroller shall deposit any money remitted under
this subparagraph to the General Fund of the State.
(VII) BEGINNING OCTOBER 1, 2025, FROM THE FINES
COLLECTED BY MONTGOMERY COUNTY AS A RESULT OF CITATIONS ISSUED AND
CONTESTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–202.1, § 21–706.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, §
21–1134, OR § 22–612 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE, ANY BALANCE
REMAINING AFTER THE ALLOCATION OF FINES UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1 OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL BE REMITTED TO THE COMPTROLLER FOR DISTRIBUTION TO
THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION TO BE USED ONLY TO ASSIST IN COVERING
THE COST TO CONSTRUCT MEDIAN DIVIDERS ON HIGHWAYS IN MONTGOMERY
COUNTY WHERE:
1. A SCHOOL BUS STOP IS LOCATED; AND
2. AT LEAST 400 CITATIONS HAVE BEEN ISSUED TO
DRIVERS TRAVELING IN THE OPPOSITE DIRECTION OF THE BUS STOP.
Article – Education
7–801.1.
(a) This section applies only [in]:
(1) IN Montgomery County; AND
(2) TO A SCHOOL BUS STOP AT A LOCATION FOR WHICH AT LEAST 400
CITATIONS HAVE BEEN ISSUED WERE ISSUED IN THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR TO
DRIVERS TRAVELING IN THE OPPOSITE DIRECTION OF THE BUS STOP.
(b) Beginning on December 31, [2026] 2028, a school bus stop may not be located
on any highway with five or more undivided traffic lanes unless:
(1) A school crossing guard is posted at the school bus stop to assist
students in crossing the highway; or
(2) A traffic control device that maintains a red signal while a student is
boarding or exiting a school bus is placed at the school bus stop.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
– 3 –

Ch. 589 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 4 –